Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 3. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND PROMOTION

CHAPTER 45. TEXAS-ISRAEL EXCHANGE RESEARCH PROGRAM

Sec. 45.001. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS; PURPOSE. (a) The legislature finds that Texas and Israel have many interests in common. They face many of the same difficulties in agriculture; the geography of both areas produces semiarid climatic conditions; there is present in both areas a rising demand for a limited supply of water coupled with increasing pressures to minimize the use of energy in all aspects of agriculture. Scientific and technological cooperatives already produce close ties between the two areas while engaging in binational projects for scientific and industrial research and development.

A program to support joint agricultural research and development by, and the development of trade and business relations between, Texas and Israel will address common problems and make substantial contributions to the development of agriculture, trade, and business in both areas. Since Texas has long emphasized broad-based agricultural research and Israel has originated and developed agricultural technologies designed to maximize production with minimal use of resources such as water and labor, each of the two areas will benefit by sharing information and expertise.

(b) The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1) establish a program to promote and support practical and applied agricultural research and development that will result in mutual benefit to Texas and Israel and will help to provide solutions to food and fiber production problems wherever they exist, particularly those relating to water conservation; and

(2) establish a program of mutual cooperation that will foster the development of trade, mutual assistance, and business relations between Texas and Israel.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1210, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 225, Sec. 2, eff. May 18, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 3.02, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 45.002. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "applied research" means the process of assembling knowledge gained by careful and diligent search and studious inquiry and examination and using that knowledge to solve practical, real-world problems.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1210, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 225, Sec. 3, eff. May 18, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 45.005. GENERAL FUNCTIONS, POWERS, AND DUTIES. (a) The department may establish a binational program to support joint agricultural research and development with Israel. The scope of agricultural research and development which the program may promote and support encompasses all scientific activities related to agriculture, including production, processing, marketing, and agricultural services, with emphasis on the support of applied research to improve water, labor, and energy utilization in agriculture.

(b) The program shall support applied research in areas of potential mutual interest, including:

(1) water conservation;

(2) water management and use;

(3) soil management and conservation;

(4) innovative sources of energy for agricultural production;

(5) environmental aspects of agricultural technology;

(6) intensive crop production; and

(7) agricultural engineering and processing.

(c) The program may undertake agricultural research and development projects of mutual benefit that are located in Texas, Israel, or any other location considered advisable by the department.

(d) The department may make research or development grants or loans to public or private entities who intend to carry out the stated objectives of the program.

(e) The program shall encourage or support the exchange of agricultural producers, scientists, teachers, students, or other types of agricultural experts between the two cooperating areas of Texas and Israel.

(f) The program shall encourage and support mutual cooperation that will foster the development of trade, mutual assistance, and business relations between Texas and Israel.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1210, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 225, Sec. 5, eff. May 18, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 3.04, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 45.007. FINANCING. (a) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506, Sec. 3.07(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2009.

(b) The department may accept gifts and grants from the federal government, state government, and private sources, as well as legislative appropriations to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The use of gifts and grants other than legislative appropriation is subject only to limitations contained in the gift or grant.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506, Sec. 3.07(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2009.

(d) The department shall make an annual accounting of all money received, awarded, and expended during the year under this chapter to the legislative committees responsible for agricultural issues.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1210, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 3.05, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 3.07(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2009.